Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.510

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Payment.

The disability leave supplement shall be paid as follows:

(1) The disability leave supplement shall begin on the sixth calendar day from the date of the injury or illness which entitles the employee to benefits under RCW 51.32.090. For the purposes of this section, the day of injury shall constitute the first calendar day.

(2) One-half of the amount of the supplement as defined in RCW 41.04.505 shall be charged against the accrued paid leave of the employee. In computing such charge, the employer shall convert accumulated days, or other time units as the case may be, to a money equivalent based on the base monthly salary of the employee at the time of the injury or illness. "Base monthly salary" for the purposes of this section means the amount earned by the employee before any voluntary or involuntary payroll deductions, and not including overtime pay.

(3) One-half of the amount of the supplement as defined in RCW 41.04.505 shall be paid by the employer.

If an employee has no accrued paid leave at the time of an injury or illness which entitles him or her to benefits under RCW 51.32.090, or if accrued paid leave is exhausted during the period of disability, the employee shall receive only that portion of the disability leave supplement prescribed by subsection (3) of this section.

[ 2012 c 117 s 7; 1989 c 21 s 1; 1985 c 462 s 3.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.